Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20222-405
Act, how cited.

Sections 2-405 to 2-409 shall be known and may be cited as the Resilient Soils and Water Quality Act.

Laws 2022, LB925, § 1.
July 21, 2022